playground/biafirand/biafirand.foma
define IrrVerbFIROT [
	  [{firot} -> {firoşe} ||  "^PSNTDI^"  _   ]
	.o.  [{firot} -> {firoş} ||  "^PSNTDI^"  _  "^PSNTDIPOST^"  ]
	.o. [ {firot} -> {firoş} ||    _ "^FTRE^"  ]
	.o. [ {firot} -> {firoş} ||   _ "^IE^"  ]
]; 

define IrregularVerbs [
	IrregularVerbMorph
	.o. IrrVerbXIST
	.o. IrrVerbGIRT
	.o. IrrVerbKET
	.o. IrrVerbDIT
	.o. IrrVerbFIROT
	.o. IrrVerbBIJART
	.o. IrrVerbJEKIR
	.o. IrrVerbLEYIST
	.o. IrrVerbMA
	.o. IrrVerbANI
	.o. IrrVerbXWEST
	.o. IrrVerbXWAR
	.o. IrrVerbGIHIST
	.o. IrrVerbSUST
	.o. IrrVerbSAND
	.o. IrrVerbHAT
	.o. IrrVerbRAHIST
	.o. IrrVerbHIST
]; 

define ReorderPrefixBI [
	[
	[0->0] 
	| [ [ {'} -> {'bi}   ||  b i "^VPBI^" VerbPrefixes  _  ]
	.o. [ {bi} -> 0   ||  _ "^VPBI^" VerbPrefixes  '   ]
	.o. [ "^VPBI^" -> 0   ||  _ VerbPrefixes  '   ] ]
	.o. [ {bibi}-> {bi}  ]  !adder for bijart verb, bibijart is not accepted in prefixed productions.
	]
];

define ReorderPrefixDI [
	[
	[0->0] 
	| [ 
		    [ {'} -> {'di}   ||  d i "^VPDI^" VerbPrefixes  _   ]
		.o. [ {di} -> 0   ||  _ "^VPDI^" VerbPrefixes  '   ]
		.o. [ "^VPDI^" -> 0   ||  _ VerbPrefixes  '   ] ]
	| [
		    [ {'} -> {'di}   ||  d i "^PSNTDI^" VerbPrefixes  _   ]
		.o. [ {di} -> 0   ||  _ "^PSNTDI^" VerbPrefixes  '   ]
		.o. [ "^PSNTDI^" -> 0   ||  _ VerbPrefixes  '   ] ]
	]
	
];

define ReorderPrefixes [
	ReorderPrefixDI  | ReorderPrefixBI
];

define VerbRules [
	VerbAndFutureRule
	.o. IrregularVerbs
	.o. IrregularVerbPSNT
	.o. ReorderPrefixes
	.o. InfinitiveVowelRules
	.o. PhoneticDeletions
];

define ErrornousGenerations [
	["^CAND^" {and} "^WIBA^" {iba}]
];

!# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define CleanErrors ErrornousGenerations -> 0;
define Cleanup Symbol  -> 0;

define Grammar 
           VerbLexicon
           .o. VerbRules 
           !.o. Lexicon 
           !.o. VerbSuffixes
	   !.o. CleanErrors	
	   !.o. Cleanup	
           ;

regex Grammar;

save stack biafirand.fst
